California, session 20252026, AB558.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7590.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7590.1. The following terms as used in this chapter have the meaning expressed in this article:(a) (1) “Advertisement” means:(A) Any written or printed communication for the purpose of soliciting, describing, or promoting the licensed business of the licensee, including a brochure, letter, pamphlet, newspaper, periodical, publication, or other writing.(B) A directory listing caused or permitted by the licensee which that indicates their licensed activity.(C) A radio, television, or similar airwave transmission that solicits or promotes the licensed business of the licensee.(2) “Advertisement” does not include any of the following:(A) Any printing or writing used on buildings, vehicles, uniforms, badges, or other property where the purpose of the printing or writing is identification.(B) Any printing or writing on communications, memoranda, or any other writings used in the ordinary course of business where the sole purpose of the writing is other than the solicitation or promotion of business.(C) Any printing or writing on novelty objects used in the promotion of the licensee’s business where the printing of the information required by this chapter would be impractical due to the available area or surface.(b) “Alarm agent” means a person employed by an alarm company operator whose duties, being physically conducted within the state, include selling on premises, altering, installing, maintaining, moving, repairing, replacing, servicing, responding, or monitoring an alarm system, and those ancillary devices connected to and controlled by the alarm system, including supplementary smoke detectors, or a person who manages or supervises a person employed by an alarm company to perform any of the duties described in this subdivision or any person in training for any of the duties described in this subdivision.(c) (1) “Alarm system” means an assembly of equipment and devices arranged to detect a hazard or signal the presence of an off-normal situation. situation, and includes a video system in which an analog or digital video signal travels from the camera to video monitoring stations.(2) “Alarm system” does not include a fire protection system, as defined in the California Fire Code.(d) “Branch office” means any location, other than the principal place of business of the licensee, which is licensed as set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 7599.20).(e) “Branch office manager” means an individual designated by the qualified manager to manage the licensee’s branch office and who has met the requirements as set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 7599.20).(f) “Bureau” means the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.(g) “Chief” means the Chief of the Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.(h) “Deadly weapon” means and includes any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, or metal knuckles; any dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other firearm; any knife having a blade longer than five inches; any razor with an unguarded blade; or any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club.(i) “Department” means the Department of Consumer Affairs.(j) “Director” means the Director of Consumer Affairs.(k) “Employee” means an individual who works for an employer, is listed on the employer’s payroll records, and is under the employer’s direction and control.(l) “Employer” means a person who employs an individual for wages or salary, lists the individual on the employer’s payroll records, and withholds all legally required deductions and contributions.(m) “Employer-employee relationship” means an individual who works for another and where the individual’s name appears on the payroll records of the employer.(n) “Firearm permit” means and includes “firearms permit,” “firearms qualification card,” “firearms qualification,” and “firearms qualification permit.”(o) “Firearms permit” means a permit issued by the bureau, pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 7596), to a licensee, a qualified manager, or an alarm agent, to carry an exposed firearm while on duty.(p) “Licensee” means a business entity, whether an individual, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation licensed under this chapter.(q) “Manager” means an individual designated under an operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company who is responsible for performing the management functions for the limited liability company specified in subdivision (c) of Section 17704.07 of the Corporations Code.(r) “Member” means an individual who is a member of a limited liability company as defined in subdivision (p) of Section 17701.02 of the Corporations Code.(s)  “Person” means any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation.(t)  “Qualified manager” means an individual who is in active control, management, and direction of the licensee’s business, and who is in possession of a current and valid qualified manager’s certificate pursuant to this chapter.(u)  “Registrant” means any person registered or who has applied for registration under this chapter.(v)  “Residential sales agreement” means and includes an agreement between an alarm company operator and an owner or tenant for the purchase of an alarm system to be utilized in the personal residence of the owner or tenant.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.